Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.370

Representations upon filing of application—Exception.

The representations specified in RCW 32.32.365 shall not be deemed to have been made by any director of the applicant who did not sign the application or any amendment thereto, if, and only to the extent that, the director files with the director within ten business days after the filing of the application or amendment a statement describing those portions of the filing as to which he or she does not so represent.

[ 1994 c 92 s 387; 1981 c 85 s 73.]